Utah statutes.
63A-3-204.   Financial control system -- Financial reports as to state funds
-- Information required of executive directors of state departments.
(1)  The director of the Division of Finance shall:
(a)  maintain a financial control system according to generally accepted
accounting principles;
(b)  record the constituent elements of the General Fund and of each special
fund in proper relationship to each other; and
(c)  keep all accounts in balance.
(2)  The director of the Division of Finance shall prepare and submit to the
governor and to the Legislature, when requested, reports showing:
(a)  the condition of the General Fund and each special fund of the state;
(b)  the available cash resources of the General Fund and each special fund of
the state;
(c)  as to each fund:
(i)  the estimated revenue and anticipated time of collection;
(ii)  the current encumbrances, future obligations, and estimated date they
accrue;
(iii)  appropriations;
(iv)  obligations;
(v)  monthly allotments;
(vi)  unencumbered allotments; and
(vii)  reserves and surpluses;
(d)  the capital assets and liability accounts of the state; and
(e)  the valuation account of all other state property.
(3)  The executive director of each department of state government and all
institutions of higher education shall submit statements containing the
information and data necessary to enable the director of the Division of
Finance to submit to the governor the reports required by Subsection (2).
